Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. (1) Notwithstanding ORS chapter 195, 197, 197A, 215, 227 or 468B or  any
statewide plan, rule of the Land Conservation and Development Commission, Environmental
Quality Commission or local land use regulation, zoning ordinance or comprehensive  plan,
Lane County  shall approve a planning application for the development of a permanent rec-
reational vehicle park or campground if the development:
(a) Is located on land that:
(A) Is within an unincorporated community and on lands  from which a developed or
committed exception has been adopted;
(B) Was identified as an area  for providing transitional housing for wildfire victims under
rules of the Land Conservation and  Development Commission and under an agreement be-
tween the applicant and the Federal Emergency Management Agency;
(C) Is currently zoned to allow for a temporary recreational vehicle park or  campground;
(D) Would not require a zone change to allow for a  permanent recreational vehicle park
or campground; and
(E) Is more than 1,000 feet from the McKenzie River; and
(b) Is conditioned upon  the applicant demonstrating and agreeing that the park or
campground:
(A) Will provide adequate electric, garbage and septic services to visitors;
(B) Will limit the number of campers and recreational vehicle residents to  not exceed 50
percent of the total overnight  accommodations that exist on the property on the date the
applicant and the Federal Emergency Management Agency enter into  the agreement de-
scribed in paragraph (a)(B) of this subsection;
(C) Will not extend  reservations for more than 29 consecutive days or more than 90 days
in any calendar year or during any consecutive six-month period;
(D) Will provide adequate parking and access consistent  with minimum local and state
requirements;
(E) Will not require the  existing septic system to receive wastes for which the system
was not designed;
(F) Will implement appropriate groundwater quality  protection requirements and com-
pliance monitoring to prevent a measurable change in the water quality of the surface water
that would be potentially affected by the proposed facility;
Enrolled House Bill 2272 (HB 2272-A) Page 1
(G) Will provide an annual written certification of proper treatment and  disposal system
operation obtained from  a qualified registered sanitarian, professional engineer or certified
wastewater treatment system operator; and
(H) Will comply with conditions established by the county for:
(i) The scope of the recreational vehicle park or campground proposed;
(ii) The location of existing structures and the siting of proposed structures;
(iii) The location of access and egress and of parking facilities;
(iv) Traffic management, including the  projected number of vehicles and any anticipated
use of public roads;
(v) Sanitation and solid waste; and
(vi) The  presence of any natural hazard for which the county has adopted development
standards.
(2) The approval of a recreational vehicle park or campgrounds under this section is not
a land use decision and is subject to review only under ORS 34.010 to 34.100.
(3) Nothing in this section relieves the  applicant of any fees, charges or assessments
assessed by the county to process this application.
(4) Nothing in this section relieves the applicant of any requirement to obtain a neces-
sary building or specialty permit.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2021 Act is repealed on January 2, 2024.
SECTION 3.  Section 2, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021  (Enrolled House Bill 2289), is amended
to read:
Sec. 2.  (1) This section applies only to owners of properties on which structures or  uses were
destroyed or interrupted by a wildfire that was identified in an  executive order issued by the Gov-
ernor in accordance with the Emergency Conflagration Act under ORS 476.510 to 476.610  between
August 1 and September 30,  2020. The local government may alter, restore or replace such a use
as provided in this section in lieu of another process.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section,  a property  owner may alter, restore
or replace a nonresidential use without further application with the local government if:
(a) The use was allowed outright as  an accessory use, without regard to whether the primary
use was destroyed or was or will be restored;
(b)(A) The use was subject to a land use process; and
(B) A permit, including a conditional permit, was  issued for the use notwithstanding any expi-
ration of the permit or any subsequent changes to the law or process; or
(c)(A) The use was established before a requirement that the use be subject  to a land use
process; and
(B) The replacement use conforms as nearly as practicable  to records of the use with the county
assessor, building permit information or other reliable records.
(3) The local government shall approve an application to  alter, restore or replace a dwelling if
the local government determines that the evidence in the record establishes that:
(a) The former dwelling:
(A) Had intact exterior walls and roof structure;
(B) Had indoor plumbing consisting of a kitchen  sink, toilet and bathing facilities connected to
a sanitary waste disposal system;
(C) Had interior wiring for interior lights;
(D) Had a heating system; and
(E)(i) Was authorized by building permits or other regulatory approval process by the appropri-
ate authority; or
(ii) Was assessed  as a residential dwelling for purposes of ad valorem taxation for the tax year
beginning July 1, 2001,  and is not subject to unresolved enforcement proceedings questioning the
lawfulness of the dwelling; and
(b) The proposed dwelling will:
(A) Not exceed the floor area of the destroyed dwelling by more than 10 percent;
Enrolled House Bill 2272 (HB 2272-A) Page 2
(B) Be adequately served by water, sanitation and roads;
(C) Be located wholly or partially within the footprint of the  destroyed dwelling unless the ap-
plicant chooses a different location within the same lot or  parcel to comply with local flood regu-
lations or to avoid a natural hazard area; and
(D) Comply with applicable building codes that were in effect on the later of:
(i) January 1, 2008; or
(ii) The date of the former dwelling’s construction.
(4) A local government may not add conditions to the approval or  siting of a dwelling under
subsection (3) of this section except as necessary to  maintain participation in the National Flood
Insurance Program  under 42 U.S.C. 4001 et seq. A local government may require that the prop-
erty owner submit an  application for a permit for the approval or siting of a nonresidential
use only for the purpose of establishing such conditions that are necessary  to maintain
participation in the National Flood Insurance Program.
(5) A local government may delegate the approval of an application under subsection  (3) of this
section  to:
(a) A hearings officer, as defined in ORS 215.402 or 227.160;
(b) A planning commission, as described in ORS 215.020; or
(c) A building official, as defined in ORS 455.715.
(6) The findings of the local government or its  designee in approving an application under sub-
section (3) of this section is not a land use decision. The local government may not  require an ap-
plicant give notice to any  nonparty. The findings and conclusions of the local government are
entitled to deference if there is any evidence to support the  findings and are subject to review only
under ORS 34.010 to 34.100.
(7) If a local government determines based on the evidence in the record that the use legally
existed, the local government may, through a  land use decision, approve an application to alter,
restore or replace a use for which a land use application, building permit or other  regulatory ap-
proval was required but record of the approval is unavailable for:
(a) A dwelling built after January 1, 2001, that complies with subsection (3)(a)(A) to (D) and  (b)
of this section; or
(b) A nonresidential use or structure.
(8) An application under this section must be filed on or before September 30, 2025.
(9) An approval of an application under this section expires only if the property  owner has not
commenced development of the structure or use on or before December 30, 2030.
SECTION 4.
This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2021 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled House Bill 2272 (HB 2272-A) Page 3
Passed by House June 10, 2021
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 23, 2021
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2272 (HB 2272-A) Page 4